Washington statutes.
RCW 39.26.251

Purchase of articles or products from inmate work programs—Replacement of goods and services obtained from outside the state—Rules.

(1) State agencies, the legislature, and departments shall purchase for their use all goods and services required by the legislature, agencies, or departments that are produced or provided in whole or in part from class II inmate work programs operated by the department of corrections through state contract. These goods and services shall not be purchased from any other source unless, upon application by the department or agency: (a) The department finds that the articles or products do not meet the reasonable requirements of the agency or department, (b) are not of equal or better quality, or (c) the price of the product or service is higher than that produced by the private sector. However, the criteria contained in (a), (b), and (c) of this subsection for purchasing goods and services from sources other than correctional industries do not apply to goods and services produced by correctional industries that primarily replace goods manufactured or services obtained from outside the state. The department of corrections and department shall adopt administrative rules that implement this section.

(2) Effective July 1, 2012, this section does not apply to the purchase of uniforms for correctional officers employed with the Washington state department of corrections.

[ 2015 c 79 s 7; 2012 c 220 s 1. Prior: 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 227; 2011 c 367 s 707; 2009 c 470 s 717; 1993 sp.s. c 20 s 1; 1986 c 94 s 2. Formerly RCW 43.19.534.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Purpose—2011 1st sp.s. c 43: See notes following RCW 43.19.003.

Effective date—2011 c 367: See note following RCW 47.29.170.

Effective date—2009 c 470: See note following RCW 46.68.170.